test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_izhichigewin_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinimiwaaibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinimiwaaibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewiniminiibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewiniminiibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewiniminiibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewiniminaanibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewiniminaanibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewiniminaanibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinimiwaaibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinimiwaaibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinimiwaaibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewiniminiibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewiniminiibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewiniminiibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewiniminaanibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewiniminaanibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewiniminaanibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewiniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinimiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinimiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinimiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewiniminiibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewiniminiibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewiniminiibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niizhichigewinishinaanibanan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niizhichigewinishinaanibanag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niizhichigewinishinaanibaning
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niizhichigewinishiwaaibanan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niizhichigewinishiwaaibanag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niizhichigewinishiwaaibaning
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niizhichigewinishiniibanan
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niizhichigewinishiniibanag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niizhichigewinishiniibaning
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewinishinaanibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinishinaanibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinishinaanibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewinishiwaaibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinishiwaaibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinishiwaaibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giizhichigewinishiniibanan
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giizhichigewinishiniibanag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giizhichigewinishiniibaning
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinishinaanibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinishinaanibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinishinaanibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinishiwaaibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinishiwaaibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinishiwaaibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oizhichigewinishiniibanan
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oizhichigewinishiniibanag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oizhichigewinishiniibaning
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3izhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iizhichigewinishiniibanan
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iizhichigewinishiniibanag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iizhichigewinishiniibaning
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefizhichigewin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iizhichigewinishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewinensimishinaaniban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewinensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewinensimishiwaaiban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewinensimishiniiban
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinensimishini***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: izhichigewinenhimishinaaniban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: izhichigewinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: izhichigewinenhimishiwaaiban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: izhichigewinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: izhichigewinenhimishiniiban
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: izhichigewinenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinensimishinaanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinensimishinaanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinensimishinaaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinensimishiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinensimishiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinensimishiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinensimishinian
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinensimishiniag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinensimishiniing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: izhichigewinenhimishinaanan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: izhichigewinenhimishinaanag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: izhichigewinenhimishinaaning
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: izhichigewinenhimishiwaaan
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: izhichigewinenhimishiwaaag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: izhichigewinenhimishiwaaing
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: izhichigewinenhimishinian
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: izhichigewinenhimishiniag
     izhichigewin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: izhichigewinenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: izhichigewinensimishibanan
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: izhichigewinensimishibanag
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: izhichigewinensimishibaning
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: izhichigewinensimish***idig, idog***an
     izhichigewin+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: izhichigewinensimish***idig, idog***ag
